src/fin-lex.txt
LEXICON PN
 +Sg1:%>X1n K ;
 +Sg2:%>X1t K ;
 +Pl1:%>X1mme K ;
 +Pl2:%>X1tte K ;
 +Pl3:%>v%^At K ;

LEXICON INF
 K ;
 +Tra:%>kse Pxx ;

LEXICON INF3
 +Ill:%>^An K ;
 +Ine:%>ss^A K ;
 +Ela:%>st^A K ;
 +Ade:%>ll^A K ;
 +Abe:%>tt^A K ;
